Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB275.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. Any school district that offers any course or other
instruction that addresses human growth, human development or human
sexuality shall include, as a part of such course or instruction, a
presentation of a high-quality, computer-generated animation or high-
definition ultrasound of at least three minutes in duration that shows the
development of the brain, heart and other vital organs in early human fetal
development.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.